Mississippi, session 2026, HB4166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Joseph Earl Greer of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Forgery on June 4, 1993, in Hinds County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to serve six (6) months in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  On November 9, 2000, he was sentenced for the crime of Grand Larceny in Rankin County, Mississippi, for five (5) years on probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  On March 14, 2011, in Hinds County, Mississippi, he was sentenced for the crime of Cocaine-Possession, for five (5) years supervised probation under the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was discharged on March 14, 2016, due to expiration of sentence.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.